Louisiana, session 2026, HB1138.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:1165.4 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1165.4. Medical test results; consent
A. As used in this Section, the following terms have the meanings ascribed
to them:
(1) "Healthcare provider" means a person or entity licensed or authorized to
provide healthcare services.
(2) "Patient portal" means a secure online website or application that allows
a patient access to the patient's health information maintained by a healthcare
provider.
(3) "Serious medical condition" means a medical condition diagnosed or
indicated by a medical test result that meets any of the following criteria:
(a) Is life-threatening.
(b) May significantly alter a patient's quality of life.
(c) Requires immediate or ongoing medical treatment or intervention.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2054 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1138
B.(1) No healthcare provider shall post or otherwise make available through
a patient portal the results of any diagnostic test indicating a serious medical
condition unless the patient has provided prior consent in accordance with the
provisions of this Section.
(2) The consent required by this Subsection shall be obtained only once and
shall remain valid for all future diagnostic test results unless revoked by the patient
in writing.
C.(1) The consent required by this Section shall clearly authorize the
healthcare provider to post medical test results indicating a serious medical condition
to a patient portal.
(2) The consent form shall be presented on a separate page that is distinct
from any other consent documents and shall not be combined with any other
authorization or acknowledgment.
(3) The disclosure contained in the consent form shall meet all of the
following:
(a) Be written in plain language.
(b) Include a statement informing the patient that test results indicating a
serious medical condition may be made available electronically prior to direct
communication with a healthcare provider.
(c) Be printed in a font size of not less than twelve-point type.
D. A patient may revoke consent at any time by submitting a written
revocation to the healthcare provider. Upon receipt of the revocation, the healthcare
provider shall cease posting such test results to the patient portal.
E. The Louisiana Department of Health may promulgate and adopt rules as
are necessary to implement the provisions of this Section.
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2054 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1138